Wyoming, session 2026, HB0064.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1.

(a) The department of health shall apply to the
centers for Medicare and Medicaid services of the United
States department of health and human services for
HB0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0353
authorization to reimburse eligible providers at an
enhanced rate for maternal services provided to eligible
Medicaid clients in rural and frontier areas. As used in
this section:

(i) "Eligible provider" means a health care
provider who is actively enrolled in Medicaid, has relevant
privileges at a labor and delivery facility and is licensed
as one (1) or more of the following:

(A) An obstetrician gynecologist;

(B) A family physician who provides
obstetrical services;

(C) A midwife;

(D) A general surgeon who provides cesarean
section backup;

(E) Any other health care provider as
determined by rule of the department of health.

HB0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0353
(ii) "Rural and frontier areas" shall be
determined by the department of health.

(b) The purposes of the enhanced reimbursement rate
authorized by this section are to:

(i) Increase access to prenatal, intrapartum and
postpartum care;

(ii) Reduce maternal and neonatal morbidity and
mortality;

(iii) Preserve obstetric provider capacity in
rural Wyoming.

(c) The department of health shall report to the
joint appropriations committee and the joint labor, health
and social services interim committee on or before October
31, 2027 regarding the additional costs incurred by the
increased reimbursements required by this act. The report
required by this section shall include any recommendations
for modifications to the increased reimbursement for
HB0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0353
eligible providers under the Wyoming Medical Assistance and
Services Act.

Section 2. There is appropriated one million dollars
($1,000,000.00) from the general fund and one million
dollars ($1,000,000.00) from federal funds to the
department of health for the purpose of enhancing Medicaid
reimbursement for eligible providers as provided by section
1 of this act. These appropriations shall be for the period
beginning July 1, 2026 and ending June 30, 2028. These
appropriations shall not be transferred or expended for any
other purpose and any unexpended, unobligated funds
remaining from these appropriations shall revert as
provided by law on June 30, 2028. It is the intent of the
legislature that these appropriations be included in the
standard budget for the department of health for the
immediately succeeding fiscal biennium.

Section 3. The department of health shall promulgate
all rules necessary to implement this act.

HB0064

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0353
Section 4.

(a) Except as provided by subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective when the state plan
amendment authorized by this act is approved by the centers
for Medicare and Medicaid services.

(b) Section 1(a) and section 4 of this act are
effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary
for a bill to become law as provided by Article 4, Section
8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(END)
HB0064